Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2676.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 516(a), (b) and (c) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 516. Audits of certain utilities.(a) General rule.--The commission shall provide for comprehensive audits of any electric, gas, telephone or water utility whose plant in service is valued at not less than $10,000,000[. The audits shall include an examination of management effectiveness and operating efficiency. The commission] and shall establish procedures for comprehensive audits of the operations of utilities as provided in this section. [Audits] The following apply:(1) Comprehensive audits shall be conducted at least once every [five years unless the commission finds that a 123456789101112131415161718 specific audit is unnecessary, but in no event shall audits be conducted less than once every eight years.] three years and shall include an assessment of:(i) management performance, effectiveness and organizational structure;(ii) operating efficiency and cost-control measures;(iii) internal accounting and financial controls;(iv) capital investment planning and project management;(v) customer service performance and billing accuracy;(vi) compliance with commission regulations and previous audit recommendations; and(vii) any other metric determined by the commission as needed.(2) A summary of the comprehensive audits mandated by this subsection shall be released to the public, and a complete copy of the comprehensive audits shall be provided to the Office of Trial Staff and the Office of Consumer Advocate.(b) Management efficiency investigations.--In addition to the comprehensive audits mandated by subsection (a), the commission shall appoint a management efficiency investigator who shall [periodically], at least once every three years, examine the management effectiveness and operating efficiency of all utilities required to be audited under subsection (a) and monitor the utility company responses to the comprehensive audits required by subsection (a). For the purposes of carrying out the periodic audit required by this subsection and for carrying out the monitoring of comprehensive audits required by 20260HB2676PN3719 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a), the commission is hereby empowered to direct the management efficiency investigator to conduct such investigations through and with teams made up of commission staff and/or independent [consulting firms] qualified auditors; further, the commission may designate specific items of management effectiveness and operating efficiency to be investigated. The management efficiency investigator shall provide an annual report to the commission, the affected utility, the Office of Trial Staff and the Office of Consumer Advocate detailing the findings of such investigations.(c) Use of independent auditing firms.--The commission [may] shall require an audit under subsection (a) or (b) to be performed by an independent [consulting firm] qualified auditor. When the commission, under either subsection (a) or (b), orders an audit to be performed by an independent [consulting firm] qualified auditor, the commission, after consultation with the utility, shall select the [firm] auditor and require the utility to enter into a contract with the [firm] auditor providing for payment of the [firm] auditor by the utility. The terms of the contract shall include all reasonable expenses directly related to the performance of the comprehensive audit or to the management efficiency investigation activities of independent [consulting firms] qualified auditors at the utility, as well as their preparation and presentation of testimony in any contested litigation which may be undertaken as a result of the audit findings under subsection (a) or (b). That contract shall require the [audit firm] independent qualified auditor to work under the direction of the commission.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2676PN3719 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930